Vermont, session 2025-2026, H621.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5822 is amended to read:
§ 5822. TAX ON INCOME OF INDIVIDUALS, ESTATES, AND TRUSTS
(a) A tax is imposed for each taxable year upon the taxable income earned
or received in that year by every individual, estate, and trust, subject to income
taxation under the laws of the United States, in an amount determined by the
following tables, and adjusted as required under this section:
(1) Married individuals filing joint returns and surviving spouses:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $64,600.00 $84,700.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $64,600.00 $84,700.00 but $2,164.00 $2,837.00 plus 6.6% of the
VT LEG #386362 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.621
2026 Page 2 of 6
not over $156,150.00 $204,750.00 amount of taxable income over
$64,600.00 $84,700.00
Over $156,150.00 $204,750.00 but $8,206.00 $10,761.00 plus 7.6% of
not over $237,950.00 $312,050.00 the amount of taxable income over
$156,150.00 $204,750.00
Over $237,950.00 $312,050.00 but $14,423.00 $18,916.00
not over $500,000.00 plus 8.75% of the amount of taxable
income over $237,950.00
$312,050.00
Over $500,000.00 but not over $35,361.00 plus 11.75% of the
$1,000,000.00 amount of taxable income over
$500,000.00
Over $1,000,000.00 $94,111.00 plus 13.75% of the
amount of taxable income over
$1,000,000.00
(2) Heads of households:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $51,850.00 $68,000.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $51,850.00 $68,000.00 but $1,737.00 $2,278.00 plus 6.6% of the
not over $133,850.00 $175,500.00 amount of taxable income over
$51,850.00 $64,200.00
VT LEG #386362 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.621
2026 Page 3 of 6
Over $133,850.00 $175,500.00 but $7,149.00 $9,373.00 plus 7.60% of
not over $216,700.00 $284,150.00 the amount of taxable income over
$133,850.00 $175,500.00
Over $216,700.00 $284,150.00 $13,446.00 $17,630.00 plus 8.75% of
but not over $455,300.00 the amount of taxable income over
$216,700.00 $284,150.00
Over $455,300.00 but not over $32,606.00 plus 11.75% of the
$910,600.00 amount of taxable income over
$455,300.00
Over $910,600.00 $86,103.00 plus 13.75% of the
amount of taxable income over
$910,600.00
(3) Unmarried individuals (other than surviving spouse or head of
household):
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $38,700.00 $50,750.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $38,700.00 $50,750.00 but $1,296.00 $1,700.00 plus 6.6% of the
not over $93,700.00 $122,850.00 amount of taxable income over
$38,700.00 $50,750.00
Over $93,700.00 $122,850.00 but $4,926.00 $6,459.00 plus 7.6% of the
not over $195,450.00 $256,300.00 amount of taxable income over
VT LEG #386362 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.621
2026 Page 4 of 6
$93,700.00 $122,850.00
Over $195,450.00 $256,300.00 but $12,659.00 $16,601.00 plus 8.75% of
not over $410,650.00 the amount of taxable income over
$195,450.00 $256,300.00
Over $410,650.00 but not over $30,108.00 plus 11.75% of the
$821,350.00 amount of taxable income over
$410,650.00
Over $821,350.00 $78,362.00 plus 13.75% of the
amount of taxable income over
$821,350.00
(4) Married individuals filing separate returns:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $32,300.00 $42,350.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $32,300.00 $42,350.00 but $1,082.00 $1,419.00 plus 6.6% of the
not over $78,075.00 $102,375.00 amount of taxable income over
$32,300.00 $42,350.00
Over $78,075.00 $102,375.00 but $4,103.00 $5,380.00 plus 7.6% of the
not over $118,975.00 $156,025.00 amount of taxable income over
$78,075.00 $102,375.00
Over $118,975.00 $156,025.00 but $7,212.00 $9,458.00 plus 8.75% of
not over $250,000.00 the amount of taxable income over
VT LEG #386362 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.621
2026 Page 5 of 6
$118,975.00 $156,025.00
Over $250,000.00 but not over $17,681.00 plus 11.75% of the
$500,000.00 amount of taxable income over
$250,000.00
Over $500,000.00 $47,056.00 plus 13.75% of the
amount of taxable income over
$500,000.00
(5) Estates and trusts:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
$2,600.00 $3,400.00 or less 3.35% of taxable income
Over $2,600.00 $3,400.00 but $87.00 $114.00 plus 6.6% of the
not over $6,100.00 $8,000.00 amount of taxable income over
$2,600.00 $3,400.00
Over $6,100.00 $8,000.00 but $318.00 $418.00 plus 7.6% of the
not over $9,350.00 $12,250.00 amount of taxable income over
$6,100.00 $8,000.00
Over $9,350.00 $12,250.00 $565.00 $741.00 plus 8.75% of the
amount of taxable income over
$9,350.00 $12,250.00
(6) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer exceeds
$150,000.00, then the tax calculated under this subsection shall be the greater
VT LEG #386362 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.621
2026 Page 6 of 6
of the tax calculated under subdivisions (1)–(5) of this subsection or three
percent of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Married individuals,” “surviving spouse,” “head of household,”
“unmarried individual,” “estate,” and “trust” have the same meaning as under
the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) The amounts of taxable income shown in the tables in this section
shall be adjusted annually for inflation by the Commissioner of Taxes using
the Consumer Price Index adjustment percentage, in the manner prescribed for
inflation adjustment of federal income tax tables for the taxable year by the
Commissioner of Internal Revenue, beginning with taxable year 2003 2026;
provided, however, notwithstanding 26 U.S.C. § 1(f)(3), that as used in this
subdivision, “consumer price index” means the last Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers published by the U.S. Department of Labor.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2026, and apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1,
2026.
VT LEG #386362 v.1